Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska83-177
Facility; chief executive officer; designation.

There shall be in each facility a chief executive officer designated as warden or superintendent and such deputy or associate wardens or assistant superintendents as the director determines. The chief executive officer shall be responsible to the director for the custody, control, and correctional treatment of persons committed to the department and for the general administration of the facility. Deputy or associate wardens or assistant superintendents in each facility shall advise and be responsible to the chief executive officer of the facility and shall have such powers and duties as the chief executive officer delegates to them in accordance with law or pursuant to the directions of the director.

Laws 1969, c. 817, § 8, p. 3076;

Laws 1993, LB 31, § 28.